Colorado, session 2026A, HB1040.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 25.5-10-231 as
follows:
25.5-10-231. Sterilization rights - legislative intent.
(1) It is the intent of the general assembly that the procedures set
forth in the following subsections be utilized when sterilization is being
considered for the primary purpose of rendering the person incapable of
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

reproduction. CONSENT REQUIRED IN SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION
APPLIES TO ANY PERSON WITH AN INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITY WHEN STERILIZATION IS BEING CONSIDERED FOR THE PRIMARY
PURPOSE OF RENDERING THE PERSON INCAPABLE OF REPRODUCTION.
(2) Any person with an intellectual and developmental disability
over eighteen years of age who has given informed consent has the right to
be sterilized, subject to the following: A PERSON WITH AN INTELLECTUAL
AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITY WHO HAS DECISION-MAKING CAPACITY
SHALL NOT BE STERILIZED IN THE ABSENCE OF THE PERSON'S INFORMED
CONSENT. A PERSON WITH AN INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITY WHO LACKS DECISION-MAKING CAPACITY SHALL NOT BE
STERILIZED IN THE ABSENCE OF THE PERSON'S INFORMED CONSENT EXCEPT
IN CIRCUMSTANCES WHERE THE DECISION IS MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH A
PROCESS, REQUIREMENTS, OR LIMITATIONS SET FORTH IN ARTICLE 14 OF
TITLE 15 OR ANY OTHER APPLICABLE LAW OR COURT ORDER.
(a) Prior to the procedure, competency to give informed consent and
assurance that such consent is voluntarily and freely given shall be
evaluated by the following:
(I) A psychiatrist, psychologist, or physician who does not provide
services or supports to the person and who has consulted with and
interviewed the person with an intellectual and developmental disability;
and
(II) An intellectual and developmental disabilities professional who
does not provide services or supports in which said person participates, and
who has consulted with and interviewed the person with an intellectual and
developmental disability.
(b) The professionals who conducted the evaluation pursuant to
paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall consult with the physician who is
to perform the operation concerning each professional's opinion in regard
to the informed consent of the person requesting the sterilization.
(3) Any person with an intellectual and developmental disability
whose capacity to give an informed consent is challenged by the intellectual
and developmental disabilities professional or the physician may file a
petition with the court to declare competency to give consent pursuant to the
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1040

procedures set forth in section 25.5-10-232.
(4) No person with an intellectual and developmental disability who
is over eighteen years of age and has the capacity to participate in the
decision-making process regarding sterilization shall be sterilized in the
absence of the person's informed consent. No minor may be sterilized
without a court order pursuant to section 25.5-10-233.
(5) Sterilization conducted pursuant to this section shall be legal.
Consent given by any person pursuant to subsection (2) of this section is not
revocable after sterilization, and no person shall be liable for acting
pursuant to such consent.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-10-220, amend (9)
as follows:
25.5-10-220. Right to medical care and treatment.
(9) No A person receiving services may MUST NOT have any organs
removed for the purpose of transplantation without the PERSON'S consent of
such person, if the person is over eighteen years of age OLD and is able to
give such consent. If the person's ability to give consent to the medical
procedure is challenged by the physician, the same procedures as those set
forth in section 25.5-10-232 shall be followed. Consent for the removal of
organs for transplantation may be given by the parents of a person receiving
services, if the person is under eighteen years of age OLD, or by the person's
legal guardian. Such A PARENT'S OR LEGAL GUARDIAN'S consent may be
given only after consultation with the interdisciplinary team and an
intellectual and developmental disabilities professional not affiliated with
the facility or community residential home in which the person receiving
services resides. However, no A person receiving services of any age may
SHALL NOT be a donor of an organ if the person implicitly or expressly
objects to such THE procedure.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 25.5-10-232,
25.5-10-233, and 25.5-10-234.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1040

12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1040